Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,107
License application; notice; hearing; environmental impact analysis required; appeal.

(1) For any application for a license, the department shall provide an opportunity, after public notice, for written comments and shall hold a public hearing in the county in which the proposed facility is to be located. The cost of such hearing shall be borne by the applicant. All testimony offered at such hearing shall be recorded. The department shall issue a written determination of the action to be taken which is based upon findings to be included in the determination and upon evidence presented during the public comment period.

(2) The department shall prepare, for each licensed activity which has a significant impact on the human environment, a written analysis of the impact of such licensed activity on the environment. The environmental impact analysis shall address each subject listed in Public Law 91-190, Title I, section 102(2)(c), 83 Stat. 853, and supporting regulations. The department shall prohibit any construction with respect to any activity for which an environmental impact analysis is required prior to completion of such analysis. The analysis shall be available to the public at the time notice is given for the hearing held pursuant to this section and shall include:

(a) An assessment of the radiological and nonradiological impacts to the public health;

(b) An assessment of any impact on any waterways and ground water;

(c) Consideration of alternatives to the activities to be conducted, including alternative sites and engineering methods; and

(d) Consideration of the long-term impacts, including closure, decommissioning, decontamination, and reclamation of facilities and sites associated with the licensed activities and management of any radioactive materials which will remain on the site after such closure, decommissioning, decontamination, and reclamation.

(3) Any final agency action or order may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 30;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 17;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 176.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.